Maine, session 132, LD703.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
Employment Services Activity 0852
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for a health care gap year program that incentivizes
recent college graduates to work in critical health care positions, particularly in underserved
and rural communities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $200,000
Page 1 - 132LR2268(05)